District of Columbia statutes.
29-504

this

Construction; applicability of Chapter 3 of this title to corporations organized under

(a)

This chapter shall not repeal, modify, or restrict the laws relating to corporations, or regulating the professions covered by this chapter, unless these laws conflict with this chapter.

(b)

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, Chapter 3 of this title shall apply to a professional corporation organized under this chapter.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-404.
1981 Ed., § 29-604.
1973 Ed., § 29-1104.
Former § 29-504 has been recodified as § 36-504.